Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1520
Political subdivision; evaluation; fee schedule.

The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to establish a tiered application fee schedule to be charged to political subdivisions requesting an environmental infrastructure sustainability evaluation as authorized under section 81-1517. The rules and regulations shall take into account the population of a political subdivision and any financial hardship that may impact the ability to pay the application fee.

Laws 2015, LB413, § 6.